Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3860.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 73 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 edition, is hereby
amended by inserting the following new section:
Section 21. Fire Safety and Response
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following
meaning:
(1) “Host community” shall mean any city or town in the Commonwealth that contains a
campus of a public college or university that owns, operates, or controls on-campus student
dormitories or other residential housing facilities.
(2) “Residential public institution of higher education” shall mean a public college or
university within the Commonwealth that provides on-campus housing for enrolled students,
including but not limited to the University of Massachusetts system and state universities.
of 3

(3) “Industry standards” shall mean the staffing and response requirements set forth in
National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) Standard 1710 or any successor standard.
(4) “Eligible fire staffing costs” shall mean salaries, overtime, training, and benefits
necessary to achieve compliance with industry standards.
(b) (1) Each host community shall annually certify its staffing needs to the secretary of
public safety and security based upon student residential population, call volume associated with
campus housing, residential density, and other relevant risk factors.
(2) The commonwealth shall aim to ensure that fire departments in host communities
have sufficient personnel to meet industry standards for alarm response related to residential
public institutions of higher education, including meeting industry standards for four firefighters
on all engine companies and response times consistent with NFPA 1710.
(3) Municipalities hosting public colleges or universities that do not provide on-campus
residential housing shall not be subject to the requirements of this clause.
(c) There shall be an established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund to be known as the Host Community Fire Safety Fund, which shall be used exclusively to
support and reimburse fire departments within host communities for eligible fire staffing costs.
(d) The Host Community Fire Safety Fund shall be funded by (i) a one-time fee on
entering students at each residential public institution of higher education, (ii) additional fees
collected by residential public institutions of higher education for the purposes of fire safety and
fire response (iii) any appropriations authorized by the general court specifically designated to be
of 3

credited to the fund, (iv) gifts, grants, and donations from public or private sources; (v) available
federal grants and other funding opportunities, and (vi) any interest earned from the fund.
(e) There shall be a one-time fee assessed on each student entering a residential public
institution of higher education for either a full- or part-time course of study, provided that
colleges and universities may waive such fee for students enrolling in a full- or part-time course
of study that have completed at least one semester at a different residential public institution of
higher education.
(f) The secretary of public safety and security shall promulgate rules and regulations for
the expenditure of money from this fund, including setting the rate for the fee required by clause
(e) and for reimbursement of host communities.
(g) The secretary of public safety and security shall distribute funds to host communities
no later than September 1 of each year. The secretary shall file a report annual on the
implementation and administration of this section to the clerks of the house and senate, and the
house and senate chairs of the joint committee on public safety and homeland security.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act shall be effective July 1 of the year following its
enactment.
of 3